Illinois, session 104th, SB2481.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 5Sections 5.857 and 6z-100 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.857)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on July 1, 2025)8    Sec. 5.857. The Capital Development Board Revolving Fund. 9This Section is repealed July 1, 2025.10(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 11103-8, eff. 6-7-23.) 12    (30 ILCS 105/6z-100)13    (Section scheduled to be repealed on July 1, 2025)14    Sec. 6z-100. Capital Development Board Revolving Fund; 15payments into and use. All monies received by the Capital 16Development Board for publications or copies issued by the 17Board, and all monies received for contract administration 18fees, charges, or reimbursements owing to the Board shall be 19deposited into a special fund known as the Capital Development 20Board Revolving Fund, which is hereby created in the State 21treasury. The monies in this Fund shall be used by the Capital 22Development Board, as appropriated, for expenditures for   SB2481- 2 -LRB104 11814 HLH 21904 b1personal services, retirement, social security, contractual 2services, legal services, travel, commodities, printing, 3equipment, electronic data processing, or telecommunications. 4For fiscal year 2021 and thereafter, the monies in this Fund 5may also be appropriated to and used by the Executive Ethics 6Commission for oversight and administration of the Chief 7Procurement Officer appointed under paragraph (1) of 8subsection (a) of Section 10-20 of the Illinois Procurement 9Code. Unexpended moneys in the Fund shall not be transferred 10or allocated by the Comptroller or Treasurer to any other 11fund, nor shall the Governor authorize the transfer or 12allocation of those moneys to any other fund. This Section is 13repealed July 1, 2025.14(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 15103-8, eff. 6-7-23.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.